Maine, session 132, LD641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only for
the Housing Problem Solving Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000